Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2012
George Amos, Jr.; appropriation; amount; payees.

There is hereby appropriated out of funds in the General Fund not otherwise appropriated the sum of fifteen thousand dollars to provide financial assistance to the family of Trooper George Amos, Jr. Upon May 21, 1973, the Director of Administrative Services shall draw his warrant upon the General Fund in the amount of seven thousand dollars in favor of Dolores Ann Amos and forward such warrant to her.

Laws 1973, LB 585, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-440.02.